Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,276
Authorized devices.

Section 60-6,275 shall not apply to (1) any transmitter, transceiver, or receiver of radio waves which has been lawfully licensed by the Federal Communications Commission or (2) any device being used by law enforcement officials in their official duties.

Laws 1982, LB 32, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,207;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 372.